North Carolina, session 2025, HB547.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 31 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 143-300.1B. Limited liability for nongovernmental organizations with agencies.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Health, human, and welfare services. – All services provided by the
Department of Health and Human Services and its various divisions, in
conjunction with or through nongovernmental organizations.
(2) Nongovernmental organization. – Any corporation, organization, or
association, incorporated or otherwise, that is organized or operating in the
State.
(3) Public agency. – The Department of Health and Human Services and any
county or local agency affiliated with the Department.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any nongovernmental
organization that contracts with the public agency for the provision of health, human, and welfare
services may be held liable for injury or damage caused by the negligence of the
nongovernmental organization, but shall not be held liable for the injury or damage caused by
the public agency, including any officer, employee, involuntary servant, volunteer, or agent of
the public agency acting within the scope of their employment or contract.
(c) The nongovernmental organization and the public agency shall each bear the costs of
defending itself against their respective acts and omissions and claims arising from those acts
and omissions.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, this section shall not be waived
or suspended by any court of competent jurisdiction. Any contract provision between parties
which purports to impose on a nongovernmental organization any liability in tort for injury or
damage, including bodily injury, mental anguish, property, economic, or noneconomic damages
or loss caused by or resulting from a public agency's negligence, in whole or in part, shall be void
and unenforceable. This section does not limit or affect the immunity provided by other State or
federal law that would otherwise be an available defense to either party."
*H547-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. Article 31 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 143-300.1C. Limited liability for contractors with agencies.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Health, human, and welfare services. – All services provided by the
Department of Health and Human Services and its various divisions, in
conjunction with or through nongovernmental independent contractors.
(2) Nongovernmental independent contractor. – An organization or individual
that exercises an independent employment and contracting to do certain work
according to its own judgment and method, without being subject to its
employer, except as to the result of the work.
(3) Public agency. – The Department of Health and Human Services and any
county or local agency affiliated with the Department.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, liability in tort shall be limited
and shall be only under this Article for any nongovernmental independent contractor that
contracts with the public agency for the provision of health, human, and welfare services, while
the nongovernmental independent contractor is performing or providing health, human, and
welfare services within the scope of the contract or agreement.
(c) In performance of health, human, and welfare services, the nongovernmental
independent contractor is deemed to be the functional equivalent of the public agency and, to the
extent that the nongovernmental independent contractor is performing or providing those services
in the stead of the public agency, the nongovernmental independent contractor is fulfilling a
public purpose authorized to be performed by the public agency.
(d) In performance of health, human, and welfare services, the nongovernmental
independent contractor shall be subject to the monetary limits provided in G.S. 143-299.2,
equivalent to those limits for the public agency. Any claim against the nongovernmental
independent contractor arising from the nongovernmental independent contractor's provision of
health, human, and welfare services shall be filed with a court of competent jurisdiction, and not
before the Industrial Commission.
(e) If any civil action is commenced against a nongovernmental independent contractor
alleging death, bodily injury, or other injury to the claimant arising out of any action or omission
within the scope of the nongovernmental independent contractor's performance or provision of
health, human, and welfare services, the State shall indemnify the nongovernmental independent
contractor for any damages incurred in excess of the monetary limits in G.S. 143-299.2 as applied
in subsection (d) of this section.
(f) Damages, court costs, litigation expenses, and other costs of indemnification,
including attorneys' fees, whether by settlement or by judgment, shall be presented by the
claimant to the Industrial Commission.
(g) Upon entry of a final judgment in excess of the monetary limits in G.S. 143-299.2 as
applied in subsection (d) of this section against the nongovernmental independent contractor, or
upon the settlement of a claim in excess of those limits, the claimant or his or her representative
shall file a copy of that judgment or settlement within 60 days after the effective date of that
settlement or judgment with the Industrial Commission."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to claims
arising from acts or omissions occurring on or after that date and contracts entered into or
renewed on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 547-First Edition